North Carolina, session 2025, SB366.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of one hundred nineteen
million two hundred thousand dollars ($119,200,000) in recurring funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to increase to seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per
15-minute increment the Medicaid rate paid for personal care services pursuant to Medicaid
Clinical Coverage Policies 3L, 3K-1, and 3K-2 provided to Medicaid beneficiaries through the
State Plan Personal Care Services Program (PCS), Community Alternatives Program for
Children (CAP/C), Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA), and
Community Alternatives Program Choice (CAP/CO). These funds shall provide a State match
for two hundred seventeen million eight hundred thousand dollars ($217,800,000) in recurring
federal funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and those funds are appropriated
to the Division of Health Benefits for the same purpose.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of nineteen million eight
hundred thousand dollars ($19,800,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to be used to increase to sixteen dollars and twenty-five cents ($16.25) per 15 minutes
the Medicaid rate paid for private duty nursing services pursuant to Medicaid Clinical Coverage
Policies 3G-1: Private Duty Nursing for Beneficiaries Age 21 and Older and 3G-2: Private Duty
Nursing for Beneficiaries Under 21 Years of Age. These funds shall provide a State match for
thirty-six million two hundred thousand dollars ($36,200,000) in recurring federal funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and those funds are appropriated to the Division of Health
Benefits for the same purpose.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S366-v-1*